Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3114
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds that areas of chronic economic distress in the State of Nebraska are a detriment to the economic well-being, health, and safety of the citizens of Nebraska. The Legislature further contends that current governmental solutions have not been able to completely resolve certain problems such as overcrowding, unemployment, and poor health and sanitary conditions in a community which lead to further deterioration. Such problems cannot be remedied by the government alone, but can be alleviated through a partnership between the government and private enterprise. It is therefor declared to be public policy in this state to encourage contributions by business firms and individuals that offer and provide community and neighborhood assistance and community services.

Laws 1984, LB 372, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 334, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2022), § 13-202.